Utah statutes.
16-16-1215.   Statement of termination.
(1)  A dissolved limited cooperative association that has completed winding up
may deliver to the division for filing a statement of termination that states:
(a)  the name of the association;
(b)  the date of filing of its initial articles of organization; and
(c)  that the association is terminated.
(2)  The filing of a statement of termination does not itself terminate the
limited cooperative association.
